Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-682
Car line companies; value and assessment.

The Property Tax Administrator shall ascertain from the statements made under sections 77-680 and 77-681, or from any other information available, the number of cars of each class required to make the total mileage in this state of each car line company within the period of one year. The Property Tax Administrator shall ascertain and fix the value upon each particular class of cars which as nearly as possible shall be the taxable value of such cars, and the number so ascertained shall be assessed to the respective car line company. The method of allocation shall be determined by the Property Tax Administrator. For the purpose of making the assessment, the Property Tax Administrator may base the assessment upon the statements of the railroad companies.

Laws 1992, LB 1063, § 67;

Laws 1992, LB 719A, § 208;

Laws 1995, LB 490, § 77.